Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.756

Tax exemption—Sales/leasebacks by regional transit authorities.

A city or town may not impose taxes on amounts received as lease payments paid by a seller/lessee to a lessor under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW 81.112.300 in respect to tangible personal property used by the seller/lessee, or to the purchase amount paid by the lessee under an option to purchase at the end of the lease term.

[ 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 28.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 18-30: See notes following RCW 81.112.300.